Utah statutes.
26-6-16.   Venereal diseases declared dangerous to public health.
Syphilis, gonorrhea, lymphogranuloma inguinale (venereum) and chancroid are
hereby declared to be contagious, infectious, communicable and dangerous to
the public health.
